Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Short Title, General Construction, and Subject Matter.

Sec. 45.02.101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code — Sales.

History.

(§ 2.101 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.102.
Scope; certain security and other transactions excluded.

Unless the context otherwise requires, this chapter applies to transactions in goods; it does not apply to a transaction that, although in the form of an unconditional contract to sell or present sale, is intended to operate only as a security transaction, nor does this chapter impair or repeal any statute regulating sales to consumers, farmers, or other specified class of buyers.

History.

(§ 2.102 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.103.
Definitions and index of definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“buyer” means a person who buys or contracts to buy goods;

[Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

“receipt” of goods means taking physical possession of them;

“seller” means a person who sells or contracts to sell goods.

Other definitions applying to this chapter and the sections in which they appear are

“acceptance” (AS

45.02.606

);

“banker’s credit” (AS

45.02.325

);

“between merchants” (AS

45.02.104

);

“cancellation” (AS

45.02.106

(d));

“commercial unit” (AS

45.02.105

);

“confirmed credit” (AS

45.02.325

);

“conforming to contract” (AS

45.02.106

);

“contract for sale” (AS 45.02.106);

“cover” (AS

45.02.712

);

“entrusting” (AS

45.02.403

);

“financing agency” (AS

45.02.104

);

“future goods” (AS

45.02.105

);

“goods” (AS 45.02.105);

“identification” (AS

45.02.501

);

“installment contract” (AS

45.02.612

);

“letter of credit” (AS 45.02.325);

“lot” (AS 45.02.105);

“merchant” (AS 45.02.104);

“overseas” (AS

45.02.323

);

“person in position of seller” (AS

45.02.707

);

“present sale” (AS 45.02.106);

“sale” (AS 45.02.106);

“sale or return” (AS

45.02.326

);

“termination” (AS 45.02.106).

The following definitions in other chapters apply to this chapter:

“check” (AS

45.03.104

);

“consignee” (AS

45.07.112

);

“consignor” (AS

45.07.112

);

“consumer goods” (AS

45.29.102

);

“control” (AS

45.07.116

);

“dishonor” (AS

45.03.502

);

“draft” (AS

45.03.104

).

In addition, AS 45.01 contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this chapter.

History.

(§ 2.103 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 11 ch 35 SLA 1993; am § 7 ch 113 SLA 2000; am §§ 10 — 12, 113 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (c)(5) was enacted as (c)(7) and renumbered in 2009, at which time former paragraphs (c)(5) and (c)(6) were renumbered as (c)(6) and (c)(7).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, repealed (a)(2), which read, “ ‘good faith’ in the case of a merchant means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade”; in (c)(2) and (c)(3), substituted “(AS

45.07.112

)” for “(AS 45.07.102)”; added (c)(7) (now (c)(5)).

Sec. 45.02.104.
Definitions: “merchant”; “between merchants”; “financing agency.”

“Merchant” means a person who deals in goods of the kind or otherwise by occupation holds oneself out as having knowledge or skill peculiar to the practices or goods involved in the transaction or to whom this knowledge or skill may be attributed by the person’s employment of an agent or broker or other intermediary who by occupation holds oneself out as having this knowledge or skill.

“Financing agency” means a bank, finance company, or other person who, in the ordinary course of business, makes advances against goods or documents of title or who, by arrangement with either the seller or the buyer, intervenes in ordinary course to make or collect payment due or claimed under the contract for sale, as by purchasing or paying the seller’s draft or making advances against it or by merely taking it for collection whether or not documents of title accompany or are associated with the draft. “Financing agency” includes also a bank or other person who similarly intervenes between persons who are in the position of seller and buyer in respect to the goods (AS

45.02.707

).

“Between merchants” means in any transaction with respect to which both parties are chargeable with the knowledge or skill of merchants.

History.

(§ 2.104 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 13 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), added “or are associated with” following “documents of title accompany”.

Sec. 45.02.105.
Definitions: transferability; “goods”; “future” goods; “lot”; “commercial unit.”

“Goods” means all things, including specially manufactured goods, that are movable at the time of identification to the contract for sale other than the money in which the price is to be paid, investment securities (AS 45.08), and things in action. “Goods” also includes the unborn young of animals and growing crops and other identified things attached to realty as described in the section on goods to be severed from realty (AS

45.02.107

).

Goods must be both existing and identified before an interest in them can pass. Goods that are not both existing and identified are “future” goods. A purported present sale of future goods or of an interest in future goods operates as a contract to sell.

There may be a sale of a part interest in existing identified goods.

An undivided share in an identified bulk of fungible goods is sufficiently identified to be sold although the quantity of the bulk is not determined. Any agreed proportion of the bulk or a quantity of the bulk agreed upon by number, weight, or other measure may, to the extent of the seller’s interest in the bulk, be sold to the buyer, who then becomes an owner in common.

“Lot” means a parcel or a single article that is the subject matter of a separate sale or delivery, whether or not it is sufficient to perform the contract.

“Commercial unit” means such a unit of goods as by commercial usage is a single whole for purposes of sale and division of which materially impairs its character or value on the market or in use. A commercial unit may be a single article (as a machine), or a set of articles (as a suite of furniture or an assortment of sizes), or a quantity (as a bale, gross, or carload), or any other unit treated in use or in the relevant market as a single whole.

History.

(§ 2.105 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.106.
Definitions: “contract”; “agreement”; “contract for sale”; “sale”; “present sale”; “conforming” to contract; “termination”; “cancellation.”

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “contract” and “agreement” are limited to those relating to the present or future sale of goods. “Contract for sale” includes both a present sale of goods and a contract to sell goods at a future time. A “sale” consists in the passing of title from the seller to the buyer for a price (AS

45.02.401

). A “present sale” means a sale that is accomplished by the making of the contract.

Goods or conduct including any part of a performance are “conforming” or conform to the contract when they are in accordance with the obligations under the contract.

“Termination” occurs when either party, under a power created by agreement or law, puts an end to the contract otherwise than for its breach. On “termination” all obligations that are still executory on both sides are discharged, but a right based on a prior breach of performance survives.

“Cancellation” occurs when either party puts an end to the contract for breach by the other and its effect is the same as that of “termination,” except that the cancelling party also retains any remedy for breach of the whole contract or an unperformed balance.

History.

(§ 2.106 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.107.
Goods to be severed from realty; recording.

A contract for the sale of minerals or the like, including oil and gas, or a structure or its materials to be removed from realty is a contract for the sale of goods within this chapter if they are to be severed by the seller, but until severance a purported present sale that is not effective as a transfer of an interest in land is effective only as a contract to sell.

A contract for the sale apart from the land of growing crops or other things attached to realty and capable of severance without material harm to them but not described in (a) of this section or of timber to be cut is a contract for the sale of goods within this chapter, whether the subject matter is to be severed by the buyer or by the seller even though it forms part of the realty at the time of contracting, and the parties can by identification effect a present sale before severance.

This section is subject to third party rights provided by the law relating to realty records. The contract for sale may be executed and recorded as a document transferring an interest in land. It then constitutes notice to third parties of the buyer’s rights under the contract for sale.

History.

(§ 2.107 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 4, 5 ch 16 SLA 1982; am § 36 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “attached to realty” for “attached to a realty”.